Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2602YC (2) 91 ll/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.502, subsections 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 1 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 30, 34, 35, and 36, Code 2025, are 2 amended by striking the subsections. 3 Sec. 2. Section 331.508, subsections 3, 4, and 5, Code 2025, 4 are amended by striking the subsections. 5